Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.565

Activities not constituting transacting business.

A nonexhaustive list of activities of a foreign limited liability partnership that do not constitute transacting business in this state is provided in RCW 23.95.520.

[ 2015 c 176 s 5116; 1998 c 103 s 1204.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.